Maine, session 132, LD1492.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §664, sub-§3, ¶D, as amended by PL 2003, c. 423, §1 and
affected by §5, is further amended to read:
D. Public employees, except those employed by the executive or judicial branch of the
State and teachers;
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §664, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 423, §2 and affected by
§5, is amended to read:
4. Compensatory time. To the extent permitted under the federal Fair Labor
Standards Act of 1938, as amended, 29 United States Code, Section 207(o), the overtime
pay requirement applicable to executive or judicial employees as described in subsection
3, paragraph D may be met through compensatory time agreements. This subsection does
not apply to teachers.
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §670-A, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 423, §3 and affected by §5, is
amended to read:
§670-A. Remedies for overtime wage violations involving state employees
Notwithstanding section 670, in an action brought to recover unpaid overtime wages
for an employee of the executive or judicial branch of the State, except for teachers, the
judgment or award is limited to the unpaid overtime compensation adjudged to be due,
without liquidated damages or attorney's fees. An action for unpaid overtime wages for an
employee of the executive or judicial branch of the State, except for teachers, must be
brought within 2 years after the cause of action accrued, except that a cause of action arising
from a willful violation of the overtime wage payment law must be commenced within 3
years after the cause of action accrued. Overtime wages are recoverable by employees of
the executive or judicial branch, except for teachers, beginning with the later of the date
the cause of action accrued and the date the applicable limitations period began.